Mississippi, session 2026, SB2324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is created a study committee for the purpose of studying the impact and societal effect of police pursuits, the necessity of police pursuits into another jurisdiction, the overall benefit of police pursuits weighed against the risks of such pursuits, the speed at which such pursuits can be undertaken safely, the crimes which would merit a police pursuit and for any other related purpose. (2)  The committee shall be comprised of the following nine (9) members: (a)  The chair, or his designee, of the Senate Judiciary, Division B Committee; (b)  The chair, or his designee, of the House Judiciary B Committee; (c)  The Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety or his or her designee; (d)  The Attorney General or his or her designee; (e)  One (1) member appointed by the Governor; (f)  One (1) member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (g)  One (1) member appointed by the Speaker of the House; (h)  The President, or designee, of the Mississippi Sheriff's Association; (i)  The President, or designee, of the Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police; (3)  Appointments to the study committee shall be made within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this act.  At the first meeting, the committee shall elect from among its membership a chairman, a vice chairman and any other officers determined to be necessary, and shall adopt rules for transacting business and keeping records. (4)  A majority of the members of the study committee shall constitute a quorum.  The study committee shall develop and report its findings and recommendations to the Legislature on or before December 1, 2026.  In the adoption of rules, resolutions and reports, and in the election of a chairman, vice chairman and any other officers determined to be necessary, an affirmative vote of a majority of the members present shall be required. (5)  The PEER Committee shall provide the staff and other support necessary for the study committee to perform its duties. (6)  To effectuate the purposes of this act, any department, division, board, bureau, committee, institution or agency of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, shall, at the request of the chairman of the study committee, provide the facilities, assistance, information and data needed to enable the study committee to carry out its duties. (7)  Upon the presentation of its report the study committee shall be dissolved. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.